Nevada, session 83, AB187.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 200.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.725 1. A person [who] shall not knowingly [prepares,
advertises] prepare, advertise or [distributes] distribute any item or
material that [depicts] :
(a) Depicts a minor engaging in, or simulating, or assisting
others to engage in or simulate, sexual conduct ; or
(b) Contains or incorporates, in any manner, an image of a
minor that has been altered through the use of artificial
intelligence to depict the minor engaging in, or simulating, or
assisting others to engage in or simulate, sexual conduct.
2. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, or by a fine of not more
than $15,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 2. NRS 200.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.730 1. A person [who] shall not knowingly and willfully
[has] have in his or her possession for any purpose any film,
photograph or other visual presentation [depicting] that:
(a) Depicts a person under the age of 16 years as the subject of a
sexual portrayal or engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to
engage in or simulate, sexual conduct [:
1.] ; or
-
*AB187*

– 3 –
(b) Contains or incorporates, in any manner, an image of a
minor that has been altered through the use of artificial
intelligence to depict the minor as the subject of a sexual portrayal
or engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to engage in or
simulate, sexual conduct.
2. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1:
(a) For the first offense, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
[2.] (b) For any subsequent offense, is guilty of a category A
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of life
with the possibility of parole, and may be further punished by a fine
of not more than $5,000.
Sec. 3. NRS 200.770 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.770 “Intimate image”:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [2,] 3, includes,
without limitation, a photograph, film, videotape or other recorded
image which depicts:
(a) The fully exposed nipple of the female breast of another
person, including through transparent clothing; or
(b) One or more persons engaged in sexual conduct.
2. Includes a photorealistic image of another person that has
been altered through the use of artificial intelligence to depict the
other person engaging in, or simulating, or assisting others to
engage in or simulate, sexual conduct.
3. Does not include an image which would otherwise constitute
an intimate image pursuant to subsection 1, but in which the person
depicted in the image:
(a) Is not clearly identifiable;
(b) Voluntarily exposed himself or herself in a public or
commercial setting; or
(c) Is a public figure.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB187*